Illinois, session 104th, HB1018.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5changing Section 513b1 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/513b1)7    Sec. 513b1. Pharmacy benefit manager contracts.8    (a) As used in this Section: 9    "340B drug discount program" means the program established 10under Section 340B of the federal Public Health Service Act, 1142 U.S.C. 256b. 12    "340B entity" means a covered entity as defined in 42 13U.S.C. 256b(a)(4) authorized to participate in the 340B drug 14discount program. 15    "340B pharmacy" means any pharmacy used to dispense 340B 16drugs for a covered entity, whether entity-owned or external. 17    "Biological product" has the meaning ascribed to that term 18in Section 19.5 of the Pharmacy Practice Act. 19    "Maximum allowable cost" means the maximum amount that a 20pharmacy benefit manager will reimburse a pharmacy for the 21cost of a drug. 22    "Maximum allowable cost list" means a list of drugs for 23which a maximum allowable cost has been established by a   HB1018- 2 -LRB104 03422 BAB 13444 b1pharmacy benefit manager. 2    "Pharmacy benefit manager" means a person, business, or 3entity, including a wholly or partially owned or controlled 4subsidiary of a pharmacy benefit manager, that provides claims 5processing services or other prescription drug or device 6services, or both, for health benefit plans. 7    "Retail price" means the price an individual without 8prescription drug coverage would pay at a retail pharmacy, not 9including a pharmacist dispensing fee. 10    "Steer" includes, but is not limited to:11        (1) requiring a covered individual to use only a 12    pharmacy, including a mail-order pharmacy, in which the 13    pharmacy benefit manager maintains an ownership interest 14    or control;15        (2) offering or implementing a plan design that 16    encourages a covered individual to use a pharmacy in which 17    the pharmacy benefit manager maintains an ownership 18    interest or control, if such plan design increases costs 19    for the covered individual, including requiring a covered 20    individual to pay full costs for a prescription if the 21    covered individual chooses not to use a pharmacy owned or 22    controlled by the pharmacy benefit manager;23        (3) reimbursing a pharmacy or pharmacist for a 24    pharmaceutical product or pharmacist service in an amount 25    less than the amount that the pharmacy benefit manager 26    reimburses itself or an affiliate for providing the same   HB1018- 3 -LRB104 03422 BAB 13444 b1    product or services, unless the pharmacy or pharmacist 2    contractually agrees to a lower reimbursement amount; or3        (4) any other actions determined by the Department by 4    rule. 5    "Third-party payer" means any entity that pays for 6prescription drugs on behalf of a patient other than a health 7care provider or sponsor of a plan subject to regulation under 8Medicare Part D, 42 U.S.C. 1395w-101 et seq. 9    (b) A contract between a health insurer and a pharmacy 10benefit manager must require that the pharmacy benefit 11manager: 12        (1) Update maximum allowable cost pricing information 13    at least every 7 calendar days. 14        (2) Maintain a process that will, in a timely manner, 15    eliminate drugs from maximum allowable cost lists or 16    modify drug prices to remain consistent with changes in 17    pricing data used in formulating maximum allowable cost 18    prices and product availability. 19        (3) Provide access to its maximum allowable cost list 20    to each pharmacy or pharmacy services administrative 21    organization subject to the maximum allowable cost list. 22    Access may include a real-time pharmacy website portal to 23    be able to view the maximum allowable cost list. As used in 24    this Section, "pharmacy services administrative 25    organization" means an entity operating within the State 26    that contracts with independent pharmacies to conduct   HB1018- 4 -LRB104 03422 BAB 13444 b1    business on their behalf with third-party payers. A 2    pharmacy services administrative organization may provide 3    administrative services to pharmacies and negotiate and 4    enter into contracts with third-party payers or pharmacy 5    benefit managers on behalf of pharmacies. 6        (4) Provide a process by which a contracted pharmacy 7    can appeal the provider's reimbursement for a drug subject 8    to maximum allowable cost pricing. The appeals process 9    must, at a minimum, include the following: 10            (A) A requirement that a contracted pharmacy has 11        14 calendar days after the applicable fill date to 12        appeal a maximum allowable cost if the reimbursement 13        for the drug is less than the net amount that the 14        network provider paid to the supplier of the drug. 15            (B) A requirement that a pharmacy benefit manager 16        must respond to a challenge within 14 calendar days of 17        the contracted pharmacy making the claim for which the 18        appeal has been submitted.19            (C) A telephone number and e-mail address or 20        website to network providers, at which the provider 21        can contact the pharmacy benefit manager to process 22        and submit an appeal.23            (D) A requirement that, if an appeal is denied, 24        the pharmacy benefit manager must provide the reason 25        for the denial and the name and the national drug code 26        number from national or regional wholesalers.  HB1018- 5 -LRB104 03422 BAB 13444 b1            (E) A requirement that, if an appeal is sustained, 2        the pharmacy benefit manager must make an adjustment 3        in the drug price effective the date the challenge is 4        resolved and make the adjustment applicable to all 5        similarly situated network pharmacy providers, as 6        determined by the managed care organization or 7        pharmacy benefit manager. 8        (5) Allow a plan sponsor contracting with a pharmacy 9    benefit manager an annual right to audit compliance with 10    the terms of the contract by the pharmacy benefit manager, 11    including, but not limited to, full disclosure of any and 12    all rebate amounts secured, whether product specific or 13    generalized rebates, that were provided to the pharmacy 14    benefit manager by a pharmaceutical manufacturer.15        (6) Allow a plan sponsor contracting with a pharmacy 16    benefit manager to request that the pharmacy benefit 17    manager disclose the actual amounts paid by the pharmacy 18    benefit manager to the pharmacy.19        (7) Provide notice to the party contracting with the 20    pharmacy benefit manager of any consideration that the 21    pharmacy benefit manager receives from the manufacturer 22    for dispense as written prescriptions once a generic or 23    biologically similar product becomes available. 24    (c) In order to place a particular prescription drug on a 25maximum allowable cost list, the pharmacy benefit manager 26must, at a minimum, ensure that:   HB1018- 6 -LRB104 03422 BAB 13444 b1        (1) if the drug is a generically equivalent drug, it 2    is listed as therapeutically equivalent and 3    pharmaceutically equivalent "A" or "B" rated in the United 4    States Food and Drug Administration's most recent version 5    of the "Orange Book" or have an NR or NA rating by 6    Medi-Span, Gold Standard, or a similar rating by a 7    nationally recognized reference; 8        (2) the drug is available for purchase by each 9    pharmacy in the State from national or regional 10    wholesalers operating in Illinois; and 11        (3) the drug is not obsolete. 12    (d) A pharmacy benefit manager is prohibited from limiting 13a pharmacist's ability to disclose whether the cost-sharing 14obligation exceeds the retail price for a covered prescription 15drug, and the availability of a more affordable alternative 16drug, if one is available in accordance with Section 42 of the 17Pharmacy Practice Act. 18    (e) A health insurer or pharmacy benefit manager shall not 19require an insured to make a payment for a prescription drug at 20the point of sale in an amount that exceeds the lesser of: 21        (1) the applicable cost-sharing amount; or22        (2) the retail price of the drug in the absence of 23    prescription drug coverage. 24    (f) Unless required by law, a contract between a pharmacy 25benefit manager or third-party payer and a 340B entity or 340B 26pharmacy shall not contain any provision that:   HB1018- 7 -LRB104 03422 BAB 13444 b1        (1) distinguishes between drugs purchased through the 2    340B drug discount program and other drugs when 3    determining reimbursement or reimbursement methodologies, 4    or contains otherwise less favorable payment terms or 5    reimbursement methodologies for 340B entities or 340B 6    pharmacies when compared to similarly situated non-340B 7    entities; 8        (2) imposes any fee, chargeback, or rate adjustment 9    that is not similarly imposed on similarly situated 10    pharmacies that are not 340B entities or 340B pharmacies; 11        (3) imposes any fee, chargeback, or rate adjustment 12    that exceeds the fee, chargeback, or rate adjustment that 13    is not similarly imposed on similarly situated pharmacies 14    that are not 340B entities or 340B pharmacies; 15        (4) prevents or interferes with an individual's choice 16    to receive a covered prescription drug from a 340B entity 17    or 340B pharmacy through any legally permissible means, 18    except that nothing in this paragraph shall prohibit the 19    establishment of differing copayments or other 20    cost-sharing amounts within the benefit plan for covered 21    persons who acquire covered prescription drugs from a 22    nonpreferred or nonparticipating provider; 23        (5) excludes a 340B entity or 340B pharmacy from a 24    pharmacy network on any basis that includes consideration 25    of whether the 340B entity or 340B pharmacy participates 26    in the 340B drug discount program;   HB1018- 8 -LRB104 03422 BAB 13444 b1        (6) prevents a 340B entity or 340B pharmacy from using 2    a drug purchased under the 340B drug discount program; or 3        (7) any other provision that discriminates against a 4    340B entity or 340B pharmacy by treating the 340B entity 5    or 340B pharmacy differently than non-340B entities or 6    non-340B pharmacies for any reason relating to the 7    entity's participation in the 340B drug discount program. 8    As used in this subsection, "pharmacy benefit manager" and 9"third-party payer" do not include pharmacy benefit managers 10and third-party payers acting on behalf of a Medicaid program. 11    (f-5) A pharmacy benefit manager or an affiliate acting on 12the pharmacy benefit manager's behalf shall not steer a 13covered individual.14    (g) A violation of this Section by a pharmacy benefit 15manager constitutes an unfair or deceptive act or practice in 16the business of insurance under Section 424. 17    (h) A provision that violates subsection (f) in a contract 18between a pharmacy benefit manager or a third-party payer and 19a 340B entity that is entered into, amended, or renewed after 20July 1, 2022 shall be void and unenforceable. 21    (i)(1) A pharmacy benefit manager may not retaliate 22against a pharmacist or pharmacy for disclosing information in 23a court, in an administrative hearing, before a legislative 24commission or committee, or in any other proceeding, if the 25pharmacist or pharmacy has reasonable cause to believe that 26the disclosed information is evidence of a violation of a   HB1018- 9 -LRB104 03422 BAB 13444 b1State or federal law, rule, or regulation.2    (2) A pharmacy benefit manager may not retaliate against a 3pharmacist or pharmacy for disclosing information to a 4government or law enforcement agency, if the pharmacist or 5pharmacy has reasonable cause to believe that the disclosed 6information is evidence of a violation of a State or federal 7law, rule, or regulation.8    (3) A pharmacist or pharmacy shall make commercially 9reasonable efforts to limit the disclosure of confidential and 10proprietary information.11    (4) Retaliatory actions against a pharmacy or pharmacist 12include cancellation of, restriction of, or refusal to renew 13or offer a contract to a pharmacy solely because the pharmacy 14or pharmacist has:15        (A) made disclosures of information that the 16    pharmacist or pharmacy has reasonable cause to believe is 17    evidence of a violation of a State or federal law, rule, or 18    regulation;19        (B) filed complaints with the plan or pharmacy benefit 20    manager; or21        (C) filed complaints against the plan or pharmacy 22    benefit manager with the Department.23    (j) This Section applies to contracts entered into or 24renewed on or after July 1, 2022. 25    (k) This Section applies to any group or individual policy 26of accident and health insurance or managed care plan that   HB1018- 10 -LRB104 03422 BAB 13444 b1provides coverage for prescription drugs and that is amended, 2delivered, issued, or renewed on or after July 1, 2020. 3(Source: P.A. 102-778, eff. 7-1-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 4103-453, eff. 8-4-23.) 5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 62025.